Rhode Island statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 7 Retail Licenses
3-7-14.3.
Class F-2 license.

A retailer’s license, class F-2, shall authorize the holder to keep for sale by auction alcoholic beverages on the premises or by televised auction for a specifically designated period, not to exceed three (3) days.

The license may be issued to religious organizations, Rhode Island non-business corporations, public corporations, and political organizations only. The city or town clerk of a municipality in which a full time licensing board does not exist shall be authorized to issue this license.

The fee for the license shall be thirty-five dollars ($35.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 3, § 1.

3-7-15.
Class G license.

A Class G retailer’s license shall be issued only to any dining car company, sleeping car company, parlor car company, and railroad company operating in this state, or any company operating passenger-carrying marine vessels in this state, or any airline operating in this state, and authorizes the holder of the license to keep for sale and to sell in its dining cars, sleeping cars, buffet cars, club cars, lounge cars and any other cars used for the transportation or accommodation of passengers, and in or on any passenger-carrying marine vessel, and in any airplane, beverages for consumption therein or thereon, but only when actually en route.

In addition, the holder of the Class G license for a passenger-carrying marine vessel may serve alcoholic beverages at retail aboard the vessel during the period thirty (30) minutes prior to the scheduled departure and until departure, provided that the local licensing board annually consents.

Each company or airline to which the license is issued shall pay to the department an annual fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for the license, paid into the state treasury.

The license expires one year from its date and is good throughout the state as a state license, and only one license is required for all cars or airplanes, but a license issued to any company or person operating passenger-carrying marine vessels in this state shall authorize the sale of beverages only in the passenger-carrying marine vessel designated and no further license shall be required or tax levied by any city or town for the privilege of selling beverages for consumption in those cars or on those vessels or in those airplanes. Each licensed dining car company, sleeping car company, and railroad car company shall keep a duplicate of the license posted in each car where beverages are sold. The department shall issue duplicates of the license from time to time upon the request of any licensed company.

In addition, the holder of the Class G license for a railroad company may serve alcoholic beverages at retail aboard its trains or in its controlled station premises, to ticket holding passengers, during the period sixty (60) minutes prior to the train’s scheduled departure and until that departure, provided that the local licensing board annually consents.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 2; P.L. 1935, ch. 2270, § 1; P.L. 1937, ch 2525, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 120; G.L. 1956, §

3-7-15

; P.L. 1960, ch. 75, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 535, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 30, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 176, § 4; P.L. 2018, ch. 289, § 4; P.L. 2018, ch. 339, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 341, § 1.

3-7-15.1.
Class GD license.

A retailer’s Class GD license, upon application, shall be issued only to an operator of a vessel engaged in regular interstate commerce, providing overnight accommodations for passengers.

The holder of a Class GD license is permitted to keep for sale and to serve alcoholic beverages to passengers traveling on board the vessel while the vessel is docked at any port in this state.

The Class GD license is good throughout this state as a state license and no further license is required or tax imposed by any city or town upon this privilege.

All licenses issued shall include the name of the vessel licensed and shall be posted on board the vessel.

The fee for the Class GD license is the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) and the term is for one year.

The Class GD license shall not authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages on board the vessel for more than seventy-two (72) consecutive hours in any one port in this state and not more than one seventy-two (72) hour period within any calendar week in any one port in this state.

A Class G and GD liquor license may be issued for the same vessel, notwithstanding the provisions of §

3-5-9

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 540, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 187, § 1.

3-7-16.
Class J convention hall license.

A retailer’s Class J license authorizes the holder of the license to keep for sale and to sell beverages at retail in the place described in the license and to deliver the beverages for consumption on the premises where sold at the times when conventions as defined in subsection (b) may be held on those premises. The licensed premises may be open for business on convention days between the hours of eleven o’clock (11:00) a.m. and one o’clock (1:00) a.m. The licensed premises may contain a bar. No Class J license shall be issued or held unless the licensee has adequate facilities to accommodate five hundred (500) or more persons, at tables, at one time. Part of the licensed premises may be set apart as a kitchen and food may be served if the licensee is the holder of a victualing license from the town or city in which the licensed premises are situated. The Class J license authorizes entertainment only in conformity with ordinances of the city or town where the facility is located on the licensed premises. Class J licenses shall only be issued by the local licensing authority. The annual fee for a Class J license is the same as a Class B license in that city or town and is payable to the town or city where the licensed premises are located.

The word “convention” is defined to include conventions, banquets, political rallies, trade shows, exhibitions, charity balls and other similar gatherings in conformity with ordinances of the city or town where the facility is located, which are held primarily for persons over eighteen (18) years of age.

A Class F and F1 liquor license may be issued on a Class J premises, notwithstanding the provisions of §

3-5-9

.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 163, § 3; P.L. 1940, ch. 814, § 2; P.L. 1976, ch. 241, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 323, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 23, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 274, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 39, § 1.

3-7-16.1.
Class L ancient underground comfort station license.

Notwithstanding any provision of this title to the contrary, the local licensing board has the power to grant and may grant on request an ancient underground comfort station license. The license may be granted to the owner, lessee or other person, firm or corporation in possession of an ancient underground comfort station which has been in existence since 1913. The underground comfort station must not have been in continuous operation as a comfort station since 1913. The Class L license grants the following privileges:

The right to keep for sale and to sell beverages at retail at the place described in the license and to deliver those beverages for consumption on the premises.

The annual fee for the license is the same as a Class B license in that city or town and is payable to the town or city where the licensed premises are located.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 352, § 1.

3-7-16.2.
Class K ancient tavern license.

The local licensing board has the power to grant and may grant on request by the legal owners of any building which has had a public and continuous use and license as a tavern for ten (10) years or more prior to 1730 A.D. (and which building is located on the same spot where the license was then effective) an ancient tavern license, effective only for the premises described above, and the license grants the following privileges:

The right to sell for consumption on the premises alcoholic beverages of all kinds as adjuncts to meals to patrons sitting at tables.

The right to open at any time after eight in the morning (8:00 a.m.) and to remain open until the closing hours established by the local board of license commissioners for other licensed places or to close at any time earlier than that set time for closing, if the owners shall elect.

The holding of the ancient tavern license is subject, as to matters of order and police, to the same rules as prevail for other licensed places in that locality and as to matters of health and sanitation, is subject to the same rules and requirements as prevail for other licensed places in that locality.

The owners of any building described in subsection (a) receiving an ancient tavern license shall pay each year to the municipality in which it is located six hundred dollars ($600) for the license.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

3-7-16.2

; P.L. 1969, ch. 85, § 1.

3-7-16.3.
Class T legitimate theater license.

Legitimate theaters as defined in subsection (b) or subsection (c) may apply for a Class T license. The license authorizes the holder of the license to keep for sale and to sell beverages at retail in the place described in the license and to deliver those beverages for consumption on the premises where sold at the times when scheduled events relating to art, the legitimate theater or community artistic experiences may be held on those premises and for a period of one hour prior to those events and one hour subsequent thereto, provided those events begin subsequent to twelve o’clock (12:00) noon. The licensed premises may contain a bar. A Class T license authorizes entertainment only in conformity with ordinances of the city or town where the facility is located on the licensed premises. Class T licenses shall only be issued by the local licensing authority.

“Legitimate theaters,” for the purposes of this section, includes nonprofit, cultural organizations and for-profit historic theaters located in the city of Newport or the town of Burrillville with a primary purpose of providing a support system to deliver and coordinate various arts activities for the benefit of the communities the theaters serve or that provide live, regularly scheduled theatrical productions on a regular basis throughout the year and all events contributing toward the goal of providing quality artistic experiences for the community.

For purposes of this section, “legitimate theaters” shall also include facility management corporations that are contractually authorized to manage buildings owned or under the authority of the Rhode Island Convention Center Authority with a primary purpose of providing a support system to deliver and coordinate various arts activities for the benefit of the communities the corporations serve or that provide live, regularly scheduled theatrical productions on a regular basis throughout the year and all events contributing toward the goal of providing quality artistic experiences for the community.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 357, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 426, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 54, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 395, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

3-7-16.4.
Class ED license.

The holder of a retail Class ED license must be situated within a defined economic development zone within the city of Providence. The city may designate by ordinance an ED zone for the purpose of encouraging commercial and industrial investment. These zones or zone must consist of one or more contiguous census tract or tracts, or any portion thereof, and must represent substantial commercial or industrial activities within the tract or tracts. At least twenty-five percent (25%) of the developable land area must be zoned for commercial or industrial purposes within the designated zone. Plans for the revitalization of the area shall be adopted by the city council. Prior to any public body acting to create an ED zone, a public hearing must be held.

Class ED licenses are nontransferable and are site specific. The application for ED licenses shall consider the type of facility, location within the designated zone, and economic impact of the commercial activities. The local licensing authority may specifically restrict the level of retail alcoholic beverages sold as well as the hours of sale. The issuing authority shall not grant a Class ED license which would provide longer operating hours for the licensee than that which is provided through any other license the authority is empowered to grant.

The number of Class ED licenses the local licensing authority may grant shall be equal to an additional twenty percent (20%) of its total licensing authority for Class B and Class C licenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 548, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 457, § 1.

3-7-16.5.
Class M License.

Notwithstanding any provision of this title to the contrary, the local licensing board of the Town of North Providence has the power to grant and may grant on request, a license for the retail sale of alcoholic beverages at such location on Mineral Spring Avenue between Woodward Road and Terry Street which has been formally and most recently utilized as a restaurant. The license may be granted to the owner, lessee or to other person, firm, or corporation in possession of the aforesaid property. The class M license grants the following privileges:

The right to keep for sale and to sell beverages at retail at the place described in the license and to deliver those beverages for consumption on the premises.

The annual fee for the license is the same as a class B license in the town and is payable to the town where the licensed premises are located.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 407, § 1.

3-7-16.6.
Class N nightclub license.

Notwithstanding any provision of this title to the contrary, any town or city council, by ordinance, may authorize the licensing authorities designated as having the right, power, and jurisdiction to issue licenses under this title pursuant to §

3-5-15

to designate and issue a special class of Class N nightclub licenses within its jurisdiction. In the city of Providence, the license authorizes the holder to keep for sale and sell beverages, including beer in cans, at retail at the place described and to deliver them for consumption on the premises or place where sold. It also authorizes the charging of a cover, minimum, or door charge. The amount of the cover, or minimum, or door charge is posted at the entrance of the establishments in a prominent place.

A Class N license, when so authorized, shall be required by each establishment within the jurisdiction that:

Has, as its primary source of revenue, the sale of alcoholic beverages and/or cover charges;

Holds a Class B or Class ED license, except in the city of Providence;

Has a fire department occupancy permit of no less than two hundred (200) persons and no greater than ten thousand (10,000) persons; or any establishment with a fire department occupancy permit of less than two hundred (200) persons that holds an entertainment license.

Any establishment with a Class N license that admits patrons under twenty-one (21) years of age on the premises of the establishment when alcoholic beverages are being sold, served, or permitted on the premises shall, during the time the patrons are permitted on the premises:

Require one form of identification. The identification shall contain the bearer’s photograph, and must be one of the following: state driver’s license, US military identification, state-issued identification card, or passport, from every person claiming to be twenty-one (21) years of age or older;

Identify patrons over twenty-one (21) years of age, with both an identifiable hand stamp and a bracelet, and shall require every patron to show both hand stamp and bracelet before purchasing an alcoholic beverage;

Sell not more than one alcoholic beverage to an eligible patron in a single transaction, and shall prohibit a patron from carrying more than one alcoholic beverage from a bar or drink-dispensing location;

Not permit any patron who leaves the premises to be readmitted prior to closing without payment of the same admission or cover charge required of patrons entering the premises initially.

The licensing authority of each town or city shall set the closing time for each establishment holding a Class N nightclub license within its jurisdiction pursuant to §

3-7-7(a)(1)

and (a)(4), and notwithstanding other provisions of those subdivisions, an establishment holding a Class N nightclub license that is permitted to remain open until two o’clock (2:00) a.m. shall not admit patrons after one o’clock (1:00) a.m.

The licensing authority of each town or city will establish the cost and duration of all Class N nightclub licenses issued by that authority.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

3-5-17

, no licensing authority may issue a Class N nightclub license unless the following notice requirements have been met:

Any establishment applying for a Class N nightclub license, or the renewal of that license, or that is the subject of a hearing relating to its Class N nightclub license, must provide the general public with notice of its application by posting a twenty-four-inch (24) by thirty-six-inch (36) notice on its premises, in a manner clearly visible to the general public, at least thirty (30) days prior to the hearing date before the licensing authority for the license, and at least thirty (30) days prior to hearings related to the license on appeal to the director. If any hearing is scheduled to occur in less than thirty (30) days, the applicant or Class N nightclub license holder must post this notice within three (3) business days after its receipt of notification of that hearing from the licensing authority or the director.

The notice shall contain the name of the applicant and a description by street and number or other plain designation of the particular location for which the Class N nightclub license is requested. The notice shall state that remonstrants are entitled to be heard at the hearing on the Class N nightclub license and shall provide the time and place of that hearing.

Any establishment that holds a Class N nightclub license must:

Comply with local ordinances governing noise levels;

Cooperate with law-enforcement officials;

Provide private security for the safety of patrons, both inside and outside the establishment, which private security must be certified by TIPS or a similar agency approved by the licensing authority; and

Collect trash generated by the establishment every night that the establishment is open, in an area surrounding the premises that is reasonable and prudent, given the size of the establishment.

The licensing authority of each town or city will develop requirements for police details for the purposes of public safety and traffic control in and around the premise of each establishment holding a Class N nightclub license.

The licensing authority that has issued a license under this section may ban the admittance of persons under the age of twenty-one (21) on the licensee’s premise:

On certain nights; or

(ii)

At certain times; or

(iii)

At all times.

(2)

Provided, however, any ban under this subsection herein shall be supported by a finding that:

The licensee has failed to implement measures designed to prevent underage drinking; and

The licensee has multiple violations of the provisions of one or more of the following sections:

3-8-1

,

3-8-4

and/or

3-8-1

0.

Upon the approval and designation of a district or districts by the board of licenses of the city of Providence, the board of licenses of the city of Providence may issue to any holder of a Class N license an extended-hours permit to extend closing hours on Thursdays, Fridays, and Saturdays, the night before a legal state holiday, or such other days as determined by the board of licenses of the city of Providence, for one hour past such license holder’s legal closing time as established by the license holder’s license or licenses including, but not limited to, those issued pursuant to subsection (d). The extended-hours permit shall not permit the sale of alcohol during the extended one-hour period and shall prohibit the admittance of new patrons in the establishment during the extended one-hour period. The designation of such district shall be for a duration of not less than six (6) months. Prior to designating any such district, the board of licenses of the city of Providence shall hold a hearing on the proposed designation. The proposed designation shall include the boundaries of the proposed district; the applicable days for the extended hours; and the duration of the designation and the conditions imposed. The proposed designation shall be advertised at least once per week for three (3) weeks prior to the hearing in a newspaper in general circulation in the city of Providence. The city of Providence shall establish an application process for an extended-hours permit for such license holder and may adopt rules and regulations to administer the permit.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 435, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 309, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 384, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 402, § 2.

3-7-16.7.
Class AS license.

A retailer’s Class AS license may be issued within the state by the local licensing authority and authorizes the licensee to sell at retail, wines purchased from a Rhode Island licensed wholesaler, to be used for sacramental purposes only, to any duly ordained priest, minister or rabbi or to any church or religious society. The label on the bottle shall designate “for sacramental or altar purposes only.” The holder of a Class A license is also authorized to sell at retail, sacramental wines to be used for sacramental purposes. The annual fee for the Class AS license is fifty dollars ($50) prorated to the year ending December 1st of every calendar year. The holder of a Class AS license shall be authorized to sell no more than two hundred fifty (250) cases of sacramental wine per calendar year. The license is limited to the same days and hours of a Class A license within the city or town where the license is issued. The sale of wine for sacramental purposes is exempt pursuant to subdivision

3-10-1(b)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 138, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 193, § 1.

3-7-16.8.
Additional license — City of Providence.

In addition to the licenses provided for in this chapter, the board of licenses of the city of Providence is authorized to establish and issue the following license. Before granting a license to any person under the provisions of §

3-7-16.8

, the board of licenses of the city of Providence shall give notice by advertisement published once a week for at least two (2) weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the city of Providence. The advertisement shall contain the name of the applicant and a description by street and number or other plain designation of the particular location for which the license is requested. Notice of the application shall also be given, by mail, to all owners of property within two hundred feet (200´) of the place of business seeking the application. The cost of the application shall be borne by the applicant. The notices shall state that remonstrants are entitled to be heard before the granting of the license and shall name the time and place of the hearing. At the time and place, the remonstrants shall be granted a full opportunity to make their objections before the licensing board acts upon the application.

Class S license — Supper club — Food and Nightclub.

A retailer’s Class S license is issued only to a licensed, bona fide tavern keeper or victualer whose tavern or victualing house may be open for business and regularly patronized at least from nine o’clock (9:00) a.m. to seven o’clock (7:00) p.m. provided no beverage is sold or served after one o’clock (1:00) a.m., nor before six o’clock (6:00) a.m. The licensing board may fix an earlier closing time, at its discretion. The annual license fee for a Class S license shall be four hundred dollars ($400) to two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

The license authorizes the holder to keep for sale and sell beverages, including beer in cans, at retail at the place described and to deliver them for consumption on the premises or place where sold, but only at tables or a lunch bar where food is served. It also authorizes the charging of a cover, minimum, or door charge. The amount of the cover, or minimum, or door charge is posted at the entrance of the establishments in a prominent place.

Any holder of a Class S license may file an application with the licensing board to open for business and serve or sell beverages until two o’clock (2:00) a.m. on Fridays and Saturdays and the night before legal state holidays. The fee for such application shall be between two hundred dollars ($200) and one thousand dollars ($1,000). All requests for a two o’clock (2:00) a.m. license shall be advertised by the board of licenses in a newspaper of general circulation published in the city of Providence.

Subject to the provisions of the Providence zoning ordinance, a holder of a retailer’s Class S license is allowed to erect signs advertising their business and products sold on the premises, including neon signs, and is allowed to light those signs during all lawful business hours, including Sundays and holidays.

The holder of a Class S license may convert their establishment from a supper club to a nightclub between designated hours, upon approval by the board of licenses at the time of the original application. The applicant shall provide to the board the designated hours it will operate as a nightclub, and all other information as required by the board of licenses for approval of a Class N license. Upon approval of such application, the licensee shall adhere to all conditions required for a Class N license holder. Provided a Class S license holder has applied for and been approved for this additional nightclub format and a violation subsequently occurs, the board may choose to impose a penalty on the supper club operation or the nightclub operation, or both, as determined by the format in operation at the time of the violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 384, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 402, § 3.

3-7-16.9.
Class WB license.

A retailer’s Class WB license authorizes the holder of the license to purchase from a licensed wholesaler a minimum of five hundred (500) gallons of wine, up to a maximum of two thousand (2,000) gallons of wine per year, for use in the wholesale manufacture of wine biscuits.

This license is subject to all the provisions of this title and the wine purchased pursuant to this license may only be used for the wholesale manufacture of wine biscuits.

Provided, that as a further condition of holding a license under this section, the holder of said license shall annually, no later than thirty (30) days after the expiration of the twelve-month (12) period after the date the license was acquired, provide the department of business regulation, on a form prescribed by the department, the actual amount of wine purchased during the reporting period. In addition to any other information the department may require, the form shall be signed and dated by the individual or representative of the entity whose name appears on the license, along with the name and address of the wholesaler(s) where the wine was purchased. The department shall promulgate any additional rules or regulations necessary to enforce the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 57, § 1.

3-7-16.10.
Class SE license.

A city or town may issue a Special Events (SE) license that shall allow any retail business not otherwise licensed in this chapter or affiliated with any entity licensed in this chapter or nonprofit organization to offer alcoholic beverages for sale at retail at, or as part of the consideration for admission to, an event to be held at its premises. Such events shall not be held more often than one day in each calendar month. The alcoholic beverages for these events shall be purchased from a Class A licensee in the same city or town, notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 163, § 1.

3-7-17.
Discretionary fees.

Where it is provided that a license fee shall be from a minimum to a maximum sum, the amount within those limits shall be fixed in the discretion of the issuing body, but in any city or town the fee for retailers’ licenses shall be uniform in every class.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 2; P.L. 1935, ch. 2270, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

3-7-17

.

3-7-18.
Licensed retailers to purchase from licensed wholesalers only.

All holders of retail licenses except retail Class G licenses shall purchase beverages for sale under their licenses only from the holder or holders of wholesale licenses under this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1935, ch. 2270, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; P.L. 1976, ch. 245, § 1.